District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.15

Repealed

Registered office and registered agent — Liability of officers for false certificate or report.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1286, ch. 854, § 619
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.15.
1981 Ed., § 29-215.
1973 Ed., § 29-215.